Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
14F

HEALTH INSURANCE RATE REGULATION--REPEALED

§§431:14F-101
to 431:14F-113 REPEALED. L
2002, c 74, §6.

Note

The purported repeal of the L 2004, c 202, §50 amendment to
§431:14F-113 on June 30, 2010, by L 2006, c 94, §1, was deleted by L 2010, c
109, §1.

L 2006, c 154, §40 purports to amend §431:14F-105(a).

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next